Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.3.   List of nonlapsing funds and accounts -- Title 46 through Title 60.

(1)  Funding for the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program, as provided in Section 53-2a-1101.

(2)  Appropriations made to the Division of Emergency Management from the State Disaster Recovery Restricted Account, as provided in Section 53-2a-603.

(3)  Appropriations made to the Department of Public Safety from the Department of Public Safety Restricted Account, as provided in Section 53-3-106.

(4)  Appropriations to the Motorcycle Rider Education Program, as provided in Section 53-3-905.

(5)  Appropriations from the Utah Highway Patrol Aero Bureau Restricted Account created in Section 53-8-303.

(6)  Appropriations from the DNA Specimen Restricted Account created in Section 53-10-407.

(7)  The Canine Body Armor Restricted Account created in Section 53-16-201.

(8)  Appropriations to the State Board of Education, as provided in Section 53A-17a-105.

(9)  Money received by the State Office of Rehabilitation for the sale of certain products or services, as provided in Section 53A-24-105.

(10)  Certain funds appropriated from the General Fund to the State Board of Regents for teacher preparation programs, as provided in Section 53B-6-104.

(11)  A certain portion of money collected for administrative costs under the School Institutional Trust Lands Management Act, as provided under Section 53C-3-202.

(12)  Certain surcharges on residential and business telephone numbers imposed by the Public Service Commission, as provided in Section 54-8b-10.

(13)  Certain fines collected by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing for violation of unlawful or unprofessional conduct that are used for education and enforcement purposes, as provided in Section 58-17b-505.

(14)  Certain fines collected by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing for use in education and enforcement of the Security Personnel Licensing Act, as provided in Section 58-63-103.

(15)  Appropriations from the Relative Value Study Restricted Account created in Section 59-9-105.

(16)  The Cigarette Tax Restricted Account created in Section 59-14-204.



Amended by Chapter 117, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 117, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

